Hawaii, session 2026, HB1700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 46-90, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title and subsection (a) to read as follows: "[[]§46-90[]]  Expedited permits; single-family [and]; multi-family; individuals with disabilities and individuals with access and functional needs; housing [project] projects; permit applications; review time eligibility. (a)  Permit applications for single-family and multi-family housing projects and housing projects for individuals with disabilities and individuals with access and functional needs in each county shall be eligible for an expedited permit approval pursuant to this section[.]; provided that housing projects approved for expedited permits for individuals with disabilities and individuals with access and functional needs shall comply with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12101, et seq., as amended), and the requirements of the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. 3601, et seq., as amended). For purposes of this subsection: "Disability" has the same meaning as defined in section 515-2. "Individual with access and functional needs" means a person who, whether temporarily or permanently, may require additional assistance, accommodations, support, or modifications to access, use, or benefit from programs, services, or facilities due to needs in functional areas such as maintaining health, independence, communication, transportation, support services, self-determination, or medical care.  "Individual with access and functional needs" includes an individual: (1)  Who is sixty-two years of age or older; (2)  With limited English proficiency; (3)  With limited access to transportation; and (4)  With limited financial resources." SECTION 2.  Each county shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2032.  Each report shall include data on the number, type, and geographic distribution of projects that received expedited permits. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2031.